Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

General Provisions

44-7-101. Marks and brands of animals running at large.

Any person owning any cattle, hogs, sheep or goats, horses or other animals, running at large, shall have an earmark or brand different from those of that person's neighbors.

Code 1858, § 1654 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 6); Shan., § 2840; Code 1932, § 5067; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1201.

Cross-References. Brands and trade-marks of timber, §43-28-311.

Annual license fee for distributors of commercial fertilizers, §43-11-104.

Registration of products, registered brands, §43-8-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 36.

Comparative Legislation. Brands and marks required:

Ala. Code §2-15-20 et seq.

Ark. Code §2-34-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §4-2-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 253.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §69-29-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 268.011 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 80-45, 80-57 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-796.29 et seq.

Collateral References. 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 8, 9.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 24, 26.

Animals
8.

44-7-102. Recording marks and brands.

Marks or brands shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the animals run; but the same brand or marks shall not be recorded to more than one (1) person in the same county.

Code 1858, § 1655 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 6); Shan., § 2841; Code 1932, § 5068; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1202.

Cross-References. Registration of cattle brands, title 44, chapter 7, part 2.

44-7-103. Priority of marks and brands.

When a dispute occurs in regard to a brand or mark, the person first recording the same is entitled thereto.

Code 1858, § 1656; Shan., § 2842; Code 1932, § 5069; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1203.

44-7-104. Horses and cattle to be branded.

The owner shall brand all horses, from eighteen (18) months old and upwards, with the same brand, and earmark and brand all the owner's cattle from twelve (12) months old and upwards with the same mark or brand.

Code 1858, § 1657 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 6); Shan., § 2843; Code 1932, § 5070; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1204.

44-7-105. Deciding dispute as to marks and brands.

If any dispute arise about an earmark or brand, it shall be decided according to entries on the book of the county clerk.

Code 1858, § 1658 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 6); Shan., § 2844; mod. Code 1932, § 5071; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1205.

44-7-106. Neat cattle purchased to be branded anew upon purchase.

Any person who buys branded neat cattle from another, or acquires same by other lawful means, shall, within eight (8) months, brand the cattle with the person's own proper brand, in the presence of two (2) credible witnesses, a certificate of which shall be signed by the witnesses.

Code 1858, § 1659 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 7); Shan., § 2845; mod. Code 1932, § 5072; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1206.

Compiler's Notes. As to cattle, this section may be affected by part 2 of this chapter.

44-7-107. Altering or defacing marks — Forfeiture.

Any person who alters or defaces the mark or brand of another, forfeits for each animal on which the mark or brand is altered or defaced, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to the owner who sues therefor in six (6) months, and to the owner or any interested third person who sues after six (6) and within twelve (12) months.

Code 1858, § 1660 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 2); Shan., § 2846; mod. Code 1932, § 5073; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1207.

Compiler's Notes. As to cattle, this section may be affected by §44-7-208.

44-7-108. Misbranding or mismarking — Forfeiture.

Any person who misbrands or mismarks any unbranded or unmarked animals not belonging to that person forfeits, as in §44-7-107, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) over and above the value of the animal, to be recovered in the same way.

Code 1858, § 1661 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 8, § 2); Shan., § 2847; Code 1932, § 5074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1208.

Compiler's Notes. As to cattle, this section may be affected by §44-7-208.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 36.

44-7-109. Inspection of record — Clerk's fee for recording.

The county clerk shall allow all citizens of the county to inspect, without charge, the book in which the marks and brands are recorded; and is entitled to fifty cents (50¢) for each record of a mark or brand.

Code 1858, § 1662; Shan., § 2848; Code 1932, § 5075; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1209.

Cross-References. Fee for recording and indexing mark or brand, §8-21-701.

44-7-110. Record of livestock brands required.

Every stockyard, slaughterhouse, and packing house licensed to do business under the laws of this state shall maintain for sixty (60) days on file a record of all visible brands on livestock handled or processed on their premises. The list shall be updated every sixty (60) days and inspection shall be made available to persons doing business with those establishments.

In the event brands are unreadable, the stockyard, slaughterhouse, or packing house will record the brand to the best of its ability with a statement declaring the condition of the brand.

Failure to comply with this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1971, ch. 147, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1219.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.